Illinois, session 104th, HB4536.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 53-11 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/3-11)7    Sec. 3-11. Institutes or inservice training workshops. 8    (a) In counties of less than 2,000,000 inhabitants, the 9regional superintendent may arrange for or conduct district, 10regional, or county institutes, or equivalent professional 11educational experiences, not more than 4 days annually. Of 12those 4 days, 2 days may be used as a teachers, administrators, 13and school support personnel workshop, when approved by the 14regional superintendent, up to 2 days may be used for 15conducting parent-teacher conferences, or up to 2 days may be 16utilized as parental institute days as provided in Section 1710-22.18d. School support personnel may be exempt from a 18workshop if the workshop is not relevant to the work they do. A 19school district may use one of its 4 institute days on the last 20day of the school term. "Institute" or "Professional 21educational experiences" means any educational gathering, 22demonstration of methods of instruction, visitation of schools 23or other institutions or facilities, sexual abuse and sexual   HB4536 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 17759 LNS 31191 b1assault awareness seminar, or training in First Aid (which may 2include cardiopulmonary resuscitation or defibrillator 3training) held or approved by the regional superintendent and 4declared by the regional superintendent to be an institute 5day, or parent-teacher conferences. With the concurrence of 6the State Superintendent of Education, the regional 7superintendent may employ such assistance as is necessary to 8conduct the institute. Two or more adjoining counties may 9jointly hold an institute. Institute instruction shall be free 10to holders of licenses good in the county or counties holding 11the institute and to those who have paid an examination fee and 12failed to receive a license.13    In counties of 2,000,000 or more inhabitants, the regional 14superintendent may arrange for or conduct district, regional, 15or county inservice training workshops, or equivalent 16professional educational experiences, not more than 4 days 17annually. Of those 4 days, 2 days may be used as a teachers, 18administrators, and school support personnel workshop, when 19approved by the regional superintendent, up to 2 days may be 20used for conducting parent-teacher conferences, or up to 2 21days may be utilized as parental institute days as provided in 22Section 10-22.18d. School support personnel may be exempt from 23a workshop if the workshop is not relevant to the work they do. 24A school district may use one of those 4 days on the last day 25of the school term. "Inservice Training Workshops" or 26"Professional educational experiences" means any educational   HB4536 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 17759 LNS 31191 b1gathering, demonstration of methods of instruction, visitation 2of schools or other institutions or facilities, sexual abuse 3and sexual assault awareness seminar, or training in First Aid 4(which may include cardiopulmonary resuscitation or 5defibrillator training) held or approved by the regional 6superintendent and declared by the regional superintendent to 7be an inservice training workshop, or parent-teacher 8conferences. With the concurrence of the State Superintendent 9of Education, the regional superintendent may employ such 10assistance as is necessary to conduct the inservice training 11workshop. With the approval of the regional superintendent, 2 12or more adjoining districts may jointly hold an inservice 13training workshop. In addition, with the approval of the 14regional superintendent, one district may conduct its own 15inservice training workshop with subject matter consultants 16requested from the county, State or any State institution of 17higher learning.18    Such institutes as referred to in this Section may be held 19on consecutive or separate days at the option of the regional 20superintendent having jurisdiction thereof.21    Whenever reference is made in this Act to "institute", it 22shall be construed to include the inservice training workshops 23or equivalent professional educational experiences provided 24for in this Section.25    Any institute advisory committee existing on April 1, 261995, is dissolved and the duties and responsibilities of the   HB4536 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 17759 LNS 31191 b1institute advisory committee are assumed by the regional 2office of education advisory board.3    Districts providing inservice training programs shall 4constitute inservice committees, 1/2 of which shall be 5teachers, 1/4 school service personnel and 1/4 administrators 6to establish program content and schedules.7    In addition to other topics not listed in this Section, 8the teachers institutes may include training committed to 9health conditions of students; social-emotional learning; 10developing cultural competency; identifying warning signs of 11mental illness and suicidal behavior in youth; domestic and 12sexual violence and the needs of expectant and parenting 13youth; protections and accommodations for students; educator 14ethics; responding to child sexual abuse and grooming 15behavior; and effective instruction in violence prevention and 16conflict resolution. Institute programs in these topics shall 17be credited toward hours of professional development required 18for license renewal as outlined in subsection (e) of Section 1921B-45. 20    (b) In this subsection (b): 21    "Trauma" is defined according to an event, an experience, 22and effects. Individual trauma results from an event, series 23of events, or set of circumstances, including early relational 24trauma, caregiver separation, disrupted attachment, or 25prolonged instability during early development, that is 26experienced by an individual as physically or emotionally   HB4536 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 17759 LNS 31191 b1harmful or life threatening and that has lasting adverse 2effects on the individual's functioning and mental, physical, 3social, or emotional well-being. Collective trauma is a 4psychological reaction to a traumatic event shared by any 5group of people. This may include, but is not limited to, 6community violence, experiencing racism and discrimination, 7and the lack of the essential supports for well-being, such as 8educational or economic opportunities, food, health care, 9housing, and community cohesion. Trauma can be experienced by 10anyone, though it is disproportionately experienced by members 11of marginalized groups. Systemic and historical oppression, 12such as racism, is often at the root of this inequity. Symptoms 13may vary at different developmental stages and across 14different cultural groups and different communities and may 15emerge or intensify during adolescence as identity 16development, autonomy, and neurological changes intersect with 17earlier trauma.18    "Trauma-informed practices" include awareness of 19populations for whom trauma may be ongoing, relational, and 20developmentally expressed over time, including, but not 21limited to, students in adoptive, foster, kinship, or 22guardianship families. 23    "Trauma-responsive learning environments" means learning 24environments developed during an ongoing, multiyear-long 25process that typically progresses across the following 3 26stages:   HB4536 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 17759 LNS 31191 b1        (1) A school or district is "trauma aware" when it:2            (A) has personnel that demonstrate a foundational 3        understanding of a broad definition of trauma that is 4        developmentally and culturally based; includes 5        students, personnel, and communities; and recognizes 6        the potential effect on biological, cognitive, 7        academic, and social-emotional functioning; and8            (B) recognizes that traumatic exposure can impact 9        behavior and learning and should be acknowledged in 10        policies, strategies, and systems of support for 11        students, families, and personnel.12        (2) A school or district is "trauma responsive" when 13    it progresses from awareness to action in the areas of 14    policy, practice, and structural changes within a 15    multi-tiered system of support to promote safety, positive 16    relationships, and self-regulation, including practices 17    that promote an effective partnership with caregivers and 18    family systems supporting students impacted by trauma, 19    while underscoring the importance of personal well-being 20    and cultural responsiveness. Such progress may:21            (A) be aligned with the Illinois Quality Framework 22        and integrated into a school or district's continuous 23        improvement process as evidence to support allocation 24        of financial resources;25            (B) be assessed and monitored by a 26        multidisciplinary leadership team on an ongoing basis;   HB4536 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 17759 LNS 31191 b1        and2            (C) involve the engagement and capacity building 3        of personnel at all levels to ensure that adults in the 4        learning environment are prepared to recognize and 5        respond to those impacted by trauma. 6        (3) A school or district is healing centered when it 7    acknowledges its role and responsibility to the community, 8    fully responds to trauma, and promotes resilience and 9    healing through genuine, trusting, and creative 10    relationships. Such school or district may:11            (A) promote holistic and collaborative approaches 12        that are grounded in culture, spirituality, civic 13        engagement, and equity; and14            (B) support agency within individuals, families, 15        and communities while engaging people in collective 16        action that moves from transactional to 17        transformational.18    "Whole child" means using a child-centered, holistic, 19equitable lens across all systems that prioritizes physical, 20mental, and social-emotional health to ensure that every child 21is healthy, safe, supported, challenged, engaged, and 22protected. 23    Starting with the 2024-2025 school year, institutes shall 24provide instruction on trauma-informed practices and include 25the definitions of trauma, trauma-responsive learning 26environments, and whole child set forth in this subsection (b)   HB4536 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 17759 LNS 31191 b1before the first student attendance day of each school year. 2(Source: P.A. 103-413, eff. 1-1-24; 103-542, eff. 7-1-24 (see 3Section 905 of P.A. 103-563 for effective date of P.A. 4103-542); 103-603, eff. 1-1-25; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.) 5    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 6becoming law.